Indiana, session 2026, HB1168.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-12-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c) and
except as provided in section 40.5 of this chapter, an individual may
have the sum of fourteen thousand dollars ($14,000) deducted from the
assessed value of the real property, mobile home not assessed as real
property, or manufactured home not assessed as real property that the
individual owns (or the real property, mobile home not assessed as real
property, or manufactured home not assessed as real property that the
individual is buying under a contract that provides that the individual
is to pay property taxes on the real property, mobile home, or
manufactured home if the contract or a memorandum of the contract is
recorded in the county recorder's office) if:
(1) the individual served in the military or naval forces of the
United States for at least ninety (90) days;
(2) the individual received an honorable discharge;
(3) the individual: either:
2026 IN 1168—LS 6516/DI 134


(A) has a total disability; or
(B) for the January 1, 2026, assessment date and each
assessment date thereafter, has been rated by the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs as individually
unemployable; or
(B) (C) is at least sixty-two (62) years old of age and has a
disability of at least ten percent (10%);
(4) the individual's disability is evidenced by:
(A) a pension certificate or an award of compensation issued
by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(B) a certificate of eligibility issued to the individual by the
Indiana department of veterans' affairs after the Indiana
department of veterans' affairs has determined that the
individual's disability qualifies the individual to receive a
deduction under this section; and
(5) the individual:
(A) owns the real property, mobile home, or manufactured
home; or
(B) is buying the real property, mobile home, or manufactured
home under contract;
on the date the statement required by section 15 of this chapter is
filed.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), the surviving
spouse of an individual may receive the deduction provided by this
section if:
(1) the individual satisfied the requirements of subsection (a)(1)
through (a)(4) at the time of death; or
(2) the individual:
(A) was killed in action;
(B) died while serving on active duty in the military or naval
forces of the United States; or
(C) died while performing inactive duty training in the military
or naval forces of the United States; and
and the surviving spouse satisfies the requirement of subsection (a)(5)
at the time the deduction statement is filed. The surviving spouse is
entitled to the deduction regardless of whether the property for which
the deduction is claimed was owned by the deceased veteran or the
surviving spouse before the deceased veteran's death.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (f), no one is entitled to the
deduction provided by this section if the assessed value of the
individual's Indiana real property, Indiana mobile home not assessed as
real property, and Indiana manufactured home not assessed as real
2026 IN 1168—LS 6516/DI 134


property, as shown by the tax duplicate, exceeds the assessed value
limit specified in subsection (d).
(d) Except as provided in subsection (f), for the:
(1) January 1, 2017, January 1, 2018, and January 1, 2019,
assessment dates, the assessed value limit for purposes of
subsection (c) is one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($175,000);
(2) January 1, 2020, January 1, 2021, January 1, 2022, and
January 1, 2023, assessment dates, the assessed value limit for
purposes of subsection (c) is two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000); and
(3) January 1, 2024, assessment date and for each assessment date
thereafter, the assessed value limit for purposes of subsection (c)
is two hundred forty thousand dollars ($240,000).
(e) An individual who has sold real property, a mobile home not
assessed as real property, or a manufactured home not assessed as real
property to another person under a contract that provides that the
contract buyer is to pay the property taxes on the real property, mobile
home, or manufactured home may not claim the deduction provided
under this section against that real property, mobile home, or
manufactured home.
(f) For purposes of determining the assessed value of the real
property, mobile home, or manufactured home under subsection (d) for
an individual who has received a deduction under this section in a
previous year, increases in assessed value that occur after the later of:
(1) December 31, 2019; or
(2) the first year that the individual has received the deduction;
are not considered unless the increase in assessed value is attributable
to substantial renovation or new improvements. Where there is an
increase in assessed value for purposes of the deduction under this
section, the assessor shall provide a report to the county auditor
describing the substantial renovation or new improvements, if any, that
were made to the property prior to the increase in assessed value.
SECTION 2. IC 6-1.1-22-19, AS ADDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 50, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19. (a) This section applies to real property tax
statements provided to taxpayers after December 31, 2025.
(b) In a manner determined by the department of local government
finance, the department of local government finance shall include on
the coupon page of the property tax statement prescribed by the
department of local government finance educational information
regarding the eligibility and procedures for the following deductions
2026 IN 1168—LS 6516/DI 134


and credit available to certain eligible taxpayers:
(1) The deduction for a veteran with a partial disability under
IC 6-1.1-12-13.
(2) The deduction for a totally disabled veteran, a veteran rated
by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as
individually unemployable, or a veteran who is at least sixty-two
(62) years of age who is partially disabled under IC 6-1.1-12-14.
(3) The deduction for a disabled veteran under IC 6-1.1-12-14.5.
(4) The credit for a person sixty-five (65) years of age or older
under IC 6-1.1-51.3-1.
2026 IN 1168—LS 6516/DI 134